New York, session 2025-2026, A4247.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The education law is amended by adding a new section 362 2 to read as follows: 3 § 362. Holidays to be observed. No class or any other course of 4 instruction shall be held in any institution within the state university 5 on those days of religious observance known as Rosh Hashanah or Yom 6 Kippur. 7 § 2. The education law is amended by adding a new section 6235 to read 8 as follows: 9 § 6235. Holidays to be observed. No class or any other course of 10 instruction shall be held in any institution within the city university 11 on those days of religious observance known as Rosh Hashanah or Yom 12 Kippur. 13 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08425-01-5